Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Construction and Equipment Aid to Nonprofit Hospitals.

Collateral references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities, §§ 52,
53.

14 C.J.S., Charities, § 1 et seq.

41 C.J.S., Hospitals, §§ 1 — 10.

Sec. 18.25.010.
Department to render aid.

The department may facilitate the purchase, construction, and repair of, and obtain necessary equipment for, nonprofit hospitals operated by municipalities, communities, and associations in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1953)

Sec. 18.25.020.
Determination of necessity.

The department shall initiate appropriate action under AS

18.25.010

—

18.25.030

when it determines which projects are of most immediate necessity, and shall allot money to the municipalities, communities, and associations on a matching basis, or in accordance with their financial ability and urgency of the need.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 1953)

Sec. 18.25.030.
Intent.

It is the intent of AS

18.25.010

—

18.25.030

to provide financial aid to municipalities, communities, and associations for which an attempt at complete financing by themselves of a necessary project would entail great hardship. It is also intended that the department utilize the money authorized under AS

18.25.010

—

18.25.030

so far as can be arranged to assist the municipalities, communities, and associations in matching funds with the federal government under applicable federal law for hospital assistance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 81 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 107 SLA 1953)